Hawaii, session 2026, HB2274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  This Act is recommended by the governor for immediate passage in accordance with section 9 of article VII of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii. SECTION 2. In prior years, the respective budget acts contained a budget proviso such as section 72 of Act 88, Session Laws of Hawaii 2021, the General Appropriations Act of 2021 (Act 88), which permitted departments to transfer funds between their programs provided that the legislature was informed of the transfers.  However, section 8 of Act 248, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, the Supplemental Appropriations Act of 2022, repealed section 72 of Act 88, and Act 250, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, the General Appropriations Act of 2025, did not reinstate the proviso.  Consequently, although funds were appropriated to various state departments for their operating programs for fiscal year 2025-2026, the proviso's elimination limits the ability of departments to transfer funds between their programs to address changing conditions. The purpose of this Act is to address the omission of the transfer proviso by providing fourth quarter funding for existing programs and adjusting funding for various programs to be commensurate with their anticipated levels of activity. The emergency appropriation and the funding adjustment made in this Act are budget neutral. SECTION 3. Act 250, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, is amended as follows: (1)  By adding new sections to read as follows: "SECTION   .  The following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 are appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii to the following programs within the department of _______________ for the purpose of continuing existing programs and operations. PROGRAM                           AMOUNT _______                           ________" (2)  By amending sections and appropriations to read as follows: "SECTION   .  Of the appropriations out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii to the following programs within the department of _________________, the following amounts are reduced. PROGRAM                           AMOUNT _______                           _________" SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST